Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 5.1 Regulation of Business Practices Among Motor Vehicle Manufacturers, Distributors, and Dealers
31-5.1-4.1.
Dealership — Survivorship.

Right of designated family member to succeed in dealership ownership. Any owner of a new motor vehicle dealership may appoint by will or any other written instrument a designated family member to succeed in the ownership interest of that owner in the new motor vehicle dealership.

Unless there exists good cause for refusal to honor that succession on the part of the manufacturer or distributor, any designated family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealer may succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer under the existing franchise provided that:

The designated family member gives the manufacturer or distributor written notice of his or her intention to succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer within one hundred twenty (120) days of the owner’s death or incapacity;

The designated family member agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the franchise; and

The designated family member shall not operate the dealership unless he or she meets the then-current criteria generally applied by the manufacturer or distributor in qualifying dealer-operators.

The manufacturer or distributor may request, and the designated family member shall provide, promptly upon the request, personal and financial data that is reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored.

Refusal to honor succession to ownership — Notice required.

If a manufacturer or distributor believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession to the ownership of a new motor vehicle dealer by a family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealer under the existing franchise agreement, the manufacturer or distributor may, not more than sixty (60) days following receipt of:

Notice of the designated family member’s intent to succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealer; or

Any personal or financial data which it has requested, serve upon the designated family member and the department of revenue notice of its refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the dealer no sooner than ninety (90) days from the date the notice is served.

The notice must state the specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession and of the manufacturer’s or distributor’s intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the new motor vehicle dealer no sooner than ninety (90) days from the date the notice is served.

If notice of refusal and discontinuance is not timely served upon the family member, the franchise shall continue in effect subject to termination only as otherwise permitted by this chapter.

Written designation of succession unaffected. This chapter does not preclude the owner of a new motor vehicle dealership from designating any person as the owner’s successor by written instrument filed with the manufacturer or distributor and, in the event there is a conflict between that written instrument and the provisions of this section, the written instrument shall govern.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 346, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 6.

31-5.1-4.2.
Establishing new dealerships and relocating existing dealerships.

In the event that a manufacturer seeks to enter into a franchise establishing an additional new motor vehicle dealership, adding an additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership, or relocating an existing new motor vehicle dealership within or into a relevant market area where the same line or make is then represented, except when the corporation operating the new motor vehicle dealership contains one or more officers who were also officers of a dealership operating at the same location as the new motor vehicle dealership immediately prior to the establishment of the new motor vehicle dealership, the manufacturer shall in writing by certified mail first notify the department and each new motor vehicle dealer in the same line or make in the relevant market area of the intention to establish an additional dealership to add an additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership, or to relocate an existing dealership within or into that market area. Within thirty (30) days of receiving notice or within thirty (30) days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, any affected new motor vehicle dealership may file with the department a protest to the establishing or relocating of the new motor vehicle dealership or adding an additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership. When a protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed, and that the manufacturer shall not establish or relocate the proposed new motor vehicle dealership or add the proposed additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership until the department has held a hearing, nor until the department has determined that there is good cause for not permitting the new motor vehicle dealership. For the purposes of this section, the reopening in a relevant market area of a new motor vehicle dealership shall be deemed the establishment of an additional new motor vehicle dealership.

In determining whether good cause has been established for entering into or relocating an additional franchise for the same line or make, or adding an additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership, the department shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited to:

Permanence of the investment of the existing new motor vehicle dealer(s) in the community;

Whether the new motor vehicle dealers of the same line or make in that relevant market area are providing adequate consumer care for the motor vehicles of the line or make in the market area which shall include the adequacy of motor vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of motor vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel;

Whether there is reasonable evidence that after the granting of the new motor vehicle dealership, that the market would support all of the dealerships of that line or make in the relevant market area;

Whether it is injurious to the public welfare for an additional new motor vehicle dealership to be established;

The growth or decline in population and new motor vehicle registrations during the past five (5) years in the relevant market area;

Whether the manufacturer is motivated principally by good faith to establish an additional or new motor vehicle dealer and not by non-economic considerations;

Whether the manufacturer has denied its existing new motor vehicle dealers of the same line or make the opportunity for reasonable growth, market expansion, or relocation;

The reasonably expected or anticipated vehicle market for the relevant market area, including demographic factors such as age of population, income, size class preference, product popularity, retail lease transactions, or other factors affecting sales to consumers in the relevant market area;

Growth or decline in population, density of population, and new car registrations in the relevant market area;

Distance, travel time, traffic patterns, and accessibility between the existing new dealership of the same new line make and the location of the proposed new or relocated dealership;

The amount of business transacted by existing new motor vehicle dealers of the line or make when compared with the amount of business available to them;

Whether the existing new motor vehicle dealers of the line or make are receiving vehicles and parts in quantities promised by the manufacturer, factory branch or distributor and on which promised quantities existing new motor vehicle dealers based their investment and scope of operations.

Any parties to a hearing by the department concerning the establishing or relocating of a new motor vehicle dealership or adding an additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership shall have a right to a review of the decision in a court of competent jurisdiction.

At any hearing conducted by the department under this section, the manufacturer or dealer seeking to establish an additional new motor vehicle dealership, relocate an existing new motor vehicle dealership, or add an additional location for an existing new motor vehicle dealership shall bear the burden of proof in establishing that good cause exists for it.

Every person, firm or corporation who prior to the retail sale of a motor vehicle, converts or otherwise assembles, installs or affixes a body, cab or special equipment to a chassis or who adds to, subtracts from or modifies a previously assembled or manufactured motor vehicle shall be required to comply with the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 346, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 50, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 267, § 1.

31-5.1-5.
Delivery obligations.

Every manufacturer shall specify to the dealer the delivery and preparation obligations of its motor vehicle dealers prior to delivery of new motor vehicles to retail buyers. A copy of the delivery and preparation obligations of its motor vehicle dealers, and a schedule of the compensation to be paid to its motor vehicle dealers for the work and services they shall be required to perform in connection with the delivery and preparation obligations, shall be filed with the department by every motor vehicle manufacturer, and shall constitute the dealer’s only responsibility for product liability as between the dealer and the manufacturer. The compensation as set forth on the schedule shall be in accordance with §§

6A-2-329

and

31-5.1-6

.

History of Section.

P. L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 3.

31-5.1-6.
Warranty agreement.

Every manufacturer shall properly fulfill any warranty agreement and adequately and fairly compensate each of its motor vehicle dealers for labor and parts. In no event shall that compensation fail to include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, as well as repair service and labor. All claims made by motor vehicle dealers for labor and parts shall be paid in accord with the provisions of this section. Any delay in payment after approval or disapproval that is caused by conditions beyond the reasonable control of the manufacturer shall not constitute a violation of this section. Reimbursement for warranty repairs or diagnostic work shall be at the dealer retail rate in effect at the time the warranty repair or diagnostic work is performed. Compensation for parts used in warranty service shall be fair and reasonable, as determined by methods described in subsection (b). Compensation for labor used in warranty service shall be fair and reasonable, as determined by methods described in subsection (c).

The retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for parts shall be established by the dealer submitting to the manufacturer or distributor one hundred (100) sequential non-warranty customer-paid service repair orders that contain warranty-like parts, or sixty (60) consecutive days of non-warranty customer-paid service repair orders that contain warranty-like parts, whichever is less, covering repairs made no more than one hundred eighty (180) days before the submission and declaring the average percentage markup. The average of the markup rates shall be presumed to be fair and reasonable, however, a manufacturer or distributor may, not later than thirty (30) days after submission, rebut that presumption by reasonably substantiating that the rate is unfair and unreasonable in light of the practices of all other franchised motor vehicle dealers in the vicinity offering the same line-make vehicles. The retail rate shall go into effect thirty (30) days following the declaration, subject to audit of the submitted repair orders by the franchisor and a rebuttal of the declared rate as described above. If the declared rate is rebutted, the manufacturer or distributor shall propose an adjustment of the average percentage markup based on that rebuttal not later than thirty (30) days after submission. If the dealer does not agree with the proposed average percentage markup, the dealer may file a protest with the department not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of that proposal by the manufacturer or distributor. If the protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer or distributor that a timely protest has been filed and that a hearing will be held on the protest. In any hearing held pursuant to this subsection, the manufacturer or distributor shall have the burden of proving that the rate declared by the dealer was unfair and unreasonable as described in this subsection and that the proposed adjustment of the average percentage markup is fair and reasonable pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.

The retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for labor may be established by submitting to the manufacturer or distributor all non-warranty customer-paid service repair orders covering repairs made during the month prior to the submission and dividing the amount of the dealer’s total labor sales by the number of total labor hours that generated those sales. The average labor rate shall be presumed to be fair and reasonable, provided a manufacturer or distributor may, not later than thirty (30) days after submission, rebut the presumption by reasonably substantiating that the rate is unfair and unreasonable in light of the practices of all other franchised motor vehicle dealers in the vicinity offering the same line-make vehicles. The average labor rate shall go into effect thirty (30) days following the declaration, subject to audit of the submitted repair orders by the franchisor and a rebuttal of the declared rate. If the declared rate is rebutted, the manufacturer or distributor shall propose an adjustment of the average labor rate based on the rebuttal not later than thirty (30) days after submission. If the dealer does not agree with the proposed average labor rate, the dealer may file a protest with the department not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of that proposal by the manufacturer or distributor. If a protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer or distributor that a timely protest has been filed and that a hearing will be held on the protest. In any hearing held pursuant to this subsection, the manufacturer or distributor shall have the burden of proving that the rate declared by the dealer was unfair and unreasonable as described in this subsection and that the proposed adjustment of the average labor rate is fair and reasonable pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.

In calculating the retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for parts and labor, the following work shall not be included in the calculation:

Repairs for manufacturer or distributor special events, specials, or promotional discounts for retail customer repairs;

Parts sold at wholesale;

Engine assemblies and transmission assemblies;

Routine maintenance not covered under any retail customer warranty, such as fluids, filters, and belts not provided in the course of repairs;

Nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do not have an individual part number;

Tires; and

Vehicle reconditioning.

If a manufacturer or distributor furnishes a part or component to a dealer at no cost, to use in performing repairs under a recall, campaign service action, or warranty repair, the manufacturer or distributor shall compensate the dealer for the part or component in the same manner as warranty parts compensation under this section by compensating the dealer the average markup on the cost for the part or component as listed in the manufacturer’s or distributor’s price schedule less the cost for the part or component.

A manufacturer or distributor may not require a dealer to establish the retail rate customarily charged by the dealer for parts and labor by an unduly burdensome or time-consuming method or by requiring information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to provide, including, but not limited to, part-by-part or transaction-by-transaction calculations. A dealer may not declare an average percentage markup or average labor rate more than twice in one calendar year.

A manufacturer or distributor may not otherwise recover its costs from dealers within this state, including an increase in the wholesale price of a vehicle or surcharge imposed on a dealer solely intended to recover the cost of reimbursing a dealer for parts and labor pursuant to this section, provided a manufacturer or distributor shall not be prohibited from increasing prices for vehicles or parts in the normal course of business.

Each manufacturer or distributor shall perform all warranty obligations, include in written notices of factory recalls to owners and dealers the expected date by which necessary parts and equipment will be available to dealers for the correction of the defects, and compensate dealers for repairs necessitated by such recall.

A claim filed under this section by a dealer with a manufacturer or distributor shall be:

In the manner and form prescribed by the manufacturer or distributor; and

Approved or disapproved within (30) days of receipt.

A claim not approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days of receipt shall be deemed approved.

Payment of, or credit issued on, a claim filed under this section shall be made within thirty (30) days of approval.

If a claim filed under this section is shown by the manufacturer or distributor to be false or unsubstantiated, the manufacturer or distributor may charge back the claim within twelve (12) months from the date the claim was paid or credit issued.

A manufacturer or distributor shall not charge back a claim based solely on a motor vehicle dealer’s incidental failure to comply with a specific claim processing requirement, such as a clerical error or other administrative technicality that does not put into question the legitimacy of the claim after the motor vehicle dealer properly resubmits the claim in accordance with the manufacturer’s or distributor’s submission guidelines.

A dealer shall have no less than sixty (60) days from the date of notification by a manufacturer or distributor of a charge back to the dealer to resubmit a claim for payment or compensation if the claim was denied for a dealer’s incidental failure as set forth in subsection (i)(3)(ii), whether the chargeback was a direct or an indirect transaction.

This subdivision does not limit the right of a manufacturer or distributor to charge back for any claim that is proven to be fraudulent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 266, § 1.

31-5.1-6.1.
Obligations during recalls.

A manufacturer shall compensate its new motor vehicle dealers for all labor and parts required by the manufacturer to perform recall repairs. Compensation for recall repairs shall be at the dealer retail rate in effect at the time the recall repair work is performed. The dealer retail rate for parts and labor shall be at the same rates as those provided for under §

31-5.1-6

. If parts or a remedy are not reasonably available to perform a recall service or repair on a used vehicle held for sale by the dealer authorized to sell new vehicles of the same line-make within thirty (30) days of the manufacturer issuing the initial notice of recall and the manufacturer has issued a “Stop-Sale,” or “Do-Not-Drive,” order on the vehicle, the manufacturer shall compensate the dealer at a rate of at least one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the value of the vehicle per month, or portion of a month, while the recall or remedy parts are unavailable and the “Stop-Sale,” or “Do-Not-Drive,” order remains in effect. A “Stop-Sale” shall be defined as a notification issued by a vehicle manufacturer to its franchised dealerships stating that certain used vehicles in inventory shall not be sold or leased, at retail and/or wholesale, due to a federal safety recall for a defect or a noncompliance, or a federal or California emissions recall.

The value of a used vehicle shall be the average trade-in value for used vehicles as indicated in an independent, third-party guide for the year, make, model, and mileage of the recalled vehicle on the later of:

The date the “Stop-Sale” or “Do-Not-Drive” order was issued; or

The date the vehicle is taken in the used motor vehicle inventory.

This section shall apply only to used vehicles subject to safety or emissions recalls pursuant to and recalled in accordance with federal law and regulations adopted thereunder and where a “Stop-Sale,” or “Do-Not-Drive,” order has been issued; provided, further, that this section shall apply only to new motor vehicle dealers holding used vehicles for sale that are a line-make that the dealer is franchised to sell or on which the dealer is authorized to perform recall repairs. This section further shall apply only to new motor vehicle dealers holding an affected used motor vehicle for sale that was:

In inventory at the time the “Stop-Sale” or “Do-Not-Drive” order was issued;

Taken in the used motor vehicle inventory of the new motor vehicle dealer as a consumer trade-in incident to the purchase of a new motor vehicle before or after the “Stop-Sale” or “Do-Not-Drive” order was issued; or

Properly taken in the used motor vehicle inventory of the new motor vehicle dealer as a lease return vehicle returned to the new motor vehicle dealer before or after the “Stop-Sale” or “Do-Not-Drive” order was issued in accordance with the terms of the applicable contract.

It shall be a violation of this section for a manufacturer to reduce the amount of compensation otherwise owed to a new motor vehicle dealer, whether through a chargeback; removal from an incentive program; reduction in amount owed under an incentive program; or any other means, because the new motor vehicle dealer has submitted a claim for reimbursement under this section, or was otherwise compensated for a vehicle subject to a recall where a “Stop-Sale,” or “Do-Not-Drive,” order has been issued.

All reimbursement claims made by new motor vehicle dealers pursuant to this section for recall remedies or repairs, or for compensation where no part or repair is reasonably available and the vehicle is subject to a “Stop-Sale” or “Do-Not-Drive” order, shall be subject to the same limitations and requirements as a warranty reimbursement claim made under §

31-5.1-6

. Claims shall be either approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days after they are submitted to the manufacturer in the manner and on the forms the manufacturer reasonably prescribes. All claims shall be paid within thirty (30) days of approval of the claim by the manufacturer. Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days after the manufacturer receives a properly submitted claim shall be deemed to be approved. In the alternative, a manufacturer may compensate its franchised dealers under a national recall compensation program provided the compensation under the program is equal to or greater than that provided under subsection (a) of this section or the manufacturer and dealer otherwise agree.

Nothing in this section shall require a manufacturer to provide total compensation to a new motor vehicle dealer that would exceed the total average trade-in value of the affected used motor vehicle as determined under subsection (b) of this section.

Any remedy provided to a dealer under this section is exclusive and may not be combined with any other state recall compensation remedy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 471, § 1.

31-5.1-7.
Unlawful restrictions on dealerships.

It shall be unlawful directly or indirectly to impose unreasonable restrictions on the motor vehicle dealer or franchisee relative to transfer, sale, right to renew, termination, discipline, non-competition covenants, site-control (whether by sublease, collateral pledge of lease, or otherwise), right of first refusal to purchase, option to purchase, compliance with subjective standards, and assertion of legal or equitable rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1.

31-5.1-8.
Agreements.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all written or oral agreements between a manufacturer and a motor vehicle dealer including, but not limited to, the franchise offering; the franchise agreement; sales of goods, services, or advertising; leases of mortgages of real or personal property; promises to pay; security interests; pledges; insurance contracts; advertising contracts; construction or installation contracts; servicing contracts; and all other agreements in which the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor has any direct or indirect interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 346, § 1.

31-5.1-9.
Product liability indemnification.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, it shall be a violation of this law for any new motor vehicle manufacturer to fail to indemnify and hold harmless its franchised new motor vehicle dealers against any judgment or settlement for damages including, but not limited to, court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees of the new motor vehicle dealer, arising out of complaints, claims, or lawsuits including, but not limited to, strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, warranty (express or implied), or revocation of the sale as defined in §

6A-2-608

, to the extent that the judgment or settlement related to the alleged defective or negligent manufacture, assembly, or design of new motor vehicles, parts, or accessories or any other function of the manufacturer, beyond the control of the dealer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 346, § 3.

31-5.1-10.
Free association.

Every franchisee shall have the right of free association with other franchisees for any lawful purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1.

31-5.1-11.
Sales to the state.

In connection with a sale of a motor vehicle or vehicles to the state or to any political subdivision, no manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler shall offer any discounts, refunds, or any other similar type of inducement to any dealer without making the same offer or offers to all other of its dealers within the relevant market area, and if any inducements are made, the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler shall give simultaneous notice to all of its dealers within the relevant market area.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1.

31-5.1-12.
Enforcement.

The department shall enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter. If the department deems that there has been a violation of this chapter, the department shall hold a show cause hearing for revocation or suspension of a license in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

Any person regulated by this chapter shall have his or her license to operate in this state revoked or suspended upon a finding by the department of a failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 3.

31-5.1-13.
Civil remedies.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise or the terms or provisions of any waiver, any consumer who is injured by a violation of this chapter, or any party to a franchise who is so injured in his or her business or property by a violation of this chapter relating to that franchise, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in violation of this chapter, may bring a civil action in the superior court to enjoin further violations, and to recover the actual damages sustained by that person together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

Any motor vehicle dealer or franchisee shall have the right to civil damages; including a reasonable attorney’s fee, for any loss sustained as a result of a violation of this chapter. A final judgment, order, or decree rendered against a person in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding under the United States anti-trust laws, under the Federal Trade Commission Act, 15 U.S.C. § 41 et seq., or under this chapter shall be regarded as prima facie evidence against that person subject to the conditions set forth in the United States anti-trust laws (15 U.S.C. § 16).

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 448, § 1.

31-5.1-14.
Contracts void.

Any contract, part of a contract, or practice under a contract in violation of any provision of this chapter shall be deemed against public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1.

31-5.1-15.
Limitation of action.

Actions arising out of any provision of this chapter shall be commenced within four (4) years next after the cause of action accrues. If a person liable under this chapter conceals the cause of action from the knowledge of the person entitled to bring it, the period prior to the discovery of his or her cause of action by the person so entitled shall be excluded in determining the time limited for the commencement of the action. If a cause of action accrues during the pendency of any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding against a person brought by the United States, or any of its agencies, under the anti-trust laws, the Federal Trade Commission Act, 15 U.S.C. § 41 et seq., or any other federal act or the laws of the state related to anti-trust laws or to franchising, that action may be commenced within one year after the final disposition of that civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1.

31-5.1-16.
Bill to set aside department order.

Any licensee or other person in interest, who is dissatisfied with the final order of the department, may appeal to the sixth division of the district court pursuant to the procedure established in §

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 10; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 13.

31-5.1-17.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 292, § 1.

31-5.1-18.
Transportation damages.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise, the new motor vehicle dealer is solely liable for damages to new motor vehicles after acceptance from the carrier and before delivery to the ultimate purchaser.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement or franchise, the manufacturer is liable for all damages to motor vehicles before delivery to a carrier or transporter.

The new motor vehicle dealer is liable for damages to new motor vehicles after delivery to the carrier only if the dealer selects the method of transportation, mode of transportation, and the carrier. In all other instances, the manufacturer is liable for carrier-related new motor vehicle damage.

On any new motor vehicle, any uncorrected damage or any corrected damage exceeding six percent (6%) of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 4216 and measured by retail repair costs, must be disclosed in writing prior to delivery. Damage to glass, tires, and bumpers is excluded from the six percent (6%) rule when replaced by identical manufacturer’s original equipment.

Repaired damage to a customer ordered new motor vehicle, not exceeding the six percent (6%) rule, shall not constitute grounds for revocation of the customer order. The customer’s right of revocation ceases upon his or her acceptance of delivery of the vehicle.

If damage to a vehicle exceeds the six percent (6%) rule at either the time the new motor vehicle is accepted by the new motor vehicle dealer, or whenever the risk of loss is shifted to the dealer (as defined in subsection (c)), whichever occurs first, then the dealer may reject the vehicle within a reasonable time. Should the dealer elect to repair any damage exceeding the six percent (6%) rule, full disclosure shall be made by the dealer in writing to the customer and an acknowledgment by the customer is required. If there is less than six percent (6%) damage as described in subsection (d) of this section, no disclosure is required. Pre-delivery mechanical work shall not require a disclosure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 347, § 1.

31-5.1-19.
Risk of loss.

If a new motor vehicle dealer determines the method of transportation, as defined in §

31-5.1-18(c)

, then the risk of loss passes to the dealer upon delivery of the vehicle to the carrier.

In every other instance, the risk of loss remains with the manufacturer until such time as the new motor vehicle dealer accepts the vehicle from the carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 347, § 1.

31-5.1-20.
Extent of damage liability to dealers.

The extent of liability to a dealer regarding repair work shall be limited to the gross charge for the repair work.

Dealers shall not be liable for transportation or rental costs during the time in which repairs are made.

In any action regarding dealers involving §§

31-5.1-18

—

31-5.1-20

the dealer shall have the right to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs upon a finding of capricious action by a litigant.

Where a dealer has refunded the purchase price in full on a new motor vehicle within thirty (30) days of delivery, and that vehicle is returned to the dealer free of collision, the dealer may sell the motor vehicle as new but the vehicle’s mileage must be disclosed to the buyer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 347, § 1.

31-5.1-21.
Promotional activities.

Upon filing of a claim, a manufacturer or distributor shall compensate a dealer for any incentive or reimbursement program sponsored by the manufacturer or distributor, under the terms of which the dealer is eligible for compensation.

A claim filed under this section shall be:

In the manner and form prescribed by the manufacturer or distributor; and

Approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days of receipt.

A claim not approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days of receipt shall be deemed approved.

Payment of a claim filed under this section shall be made within thirty (30) days of approval.

If a claim filed under this section is shown by the manufacturer or distributor to be false or unsubstantiated, the manufacturer or distributor may charge back the claim within one year from the date the claim was paid or credit issued or one year from the end of a manufacturer program that does not exceed one year in length, whichever is later.

A manufacturer or distributor shall not charge back a claim based solely on a motor vehicle dealer’s incidental failure to comply with a specific claim processing requirement, such as a clerical error or other administrative technicality that does not put into question the legitimacy of the claim after the motor vehicle dealer properly resubmits the claim in accordance with the manufacturer’s or distributor’s submission guidelines.

A dealer shall have no less than sixty (60) days from the date of notification by a manufacturer or distributor of a charge back to the dealer to resubmit a claim for payment or compensation if the claim was denied for a dealer’s incidental failure as set forth in subsection (c)(1)(ii) whether the chargeback was a direct or an indirect transaction.

This paragraph does not limit the right of a manufacturer or distributor to charge back for any claim that is proven fraudulent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 397, § 1.